Nevada, session 83, AB172.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 205 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Electronic communications system” means any:
1. Wire, radio, electromagnetic, photooptical or
photoelectronic facilities for the transmission of wire or electronic
communications; and
2. Computer facilities or related electronic equipment for the
electronic storage of such communications.
Sec. 3. “Remote computing service” means the provision to
the public of computer storage or processing services by means of
an electronic communications system.
Sec. 4. NRS 205.473 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.473 As used in NRS 205.473 to 205.513, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in NRS 205.4732 to 205.476, inclusive,
and sections 2 and 3 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them
in those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 205.4758 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.4758 “Provider of Internet service” means any provider
who provides subscribers or customers with [access] :
1. Access to the Internet or an electronic mail address, or both
[.] ; or
2. A remote computing service.
H
-
*AB172*